Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.230

Sewerage lien foreclosure—Limitation on time of commencement.

An action to foreclose a sewerage lien pursuant to a lien notice filed as required by law must be commenced within two years from the date of the filing thereof.

An action to foreclose a six months' lien may be commenced at any time after six months subsequent to the furnishing of the sewerage service for which payment has not been made.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.67.230. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 7, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-10, part.]